California, session 20252026, AB999.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21709 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:21709. (a) To the extent allowed by federal law, the owners and operators of a skydiving or sport parachuting operation shall have a duty to ensure that the parachutist in command of a tandem jump and the parachute rigger responsible for packing the parachute are in compliance with all federal laws relating to parachute safety and certification.(b) This section does shall not decrease any legal duties.